docker/elastic/sk/hunspell/sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX C Y 83 # vzor pre živ. pod.mená. ak N plurál je -i okrem hosť
SFX C   0           i          [^acéhiklľnortť]
SFX C   0           i          [^o]dič
SFX C   0           i          [^d]ič
SFX C   0           i          [^i]č
SFX C   0           i          [ln]
SFX C   ch          si         ch
SFX C   k           ci         k
SFX C   ec          ci         ec
SFX C   0           i          jel
SFX C   el          li         el
SFX C   ľ           li         [áeo]ľ
SFX C   0           i          lan
SFX C   0           i          [^b]rat
SFX C   0           i          [^r]at
SFX C   0           i          [^a]t
SFX C   ť           tia        ť
SFX C   on          ni         zon
SFX C   0           vi         o
SFX C   0           i          [inp]er
SFX C   er          ri         [^inp]er
SFX C   or          ri         bor	# obor
SFX C   0           i          [^b]or
SFX C   0           i          [^eo][cr]
SFX C   ť           tí         ť
SFX C   0           ami        ť
SFX C   ec          ca         ec
SFX C   ec          cov        ec
SFX C   ec          covi       ec
SFX C   ec          com        ec
SFX C   ec          coch       ec
SFX C   ec          cami       ec
SFX C   on          ni         zon
SFX C   on          na         zon
SFX C   on          nov        zon
SFX C   on          novi       zon
SFX C   on          nom        zon
SFX C   on          noch       zon
SFX C   on          nami       zon
SFX C   o           a          o
SFX C   0           v          o
SFX C   0           ch         o
SFX C   0           m          o
SFX C   o           ami        o
SFX C   0           ov         [inp]er
SFX C   0           ovi        [inp]er
SFX C   0           om         [inp]er
SFX C   0           och        [inp]er
SFX C   0           mi         [inp]er
SFX C   er          ra         [^inp]er
SFX C   er          rov        [^inp]er
SFX C   er          rovi       [^inp]er
SFX C   er          rom        [^inp]er
SFX C   er          roch       [^inp]er
SFX C   er          rami       [^inp]er
SFX C   or          ra         [bg]or
SFX C   or          rov        [bg]or
SFX C   or          rovi       [bg]or
SFX C   or          rom        [bg]or
SFX C   or          roch       [bg]or
SFX C   or          rami       [bg]or
SFX C   0           a          [^bg]or
SFX C   0           ov         [^bg]or
SFX C   0           ovi        [^bg]or
SFX C   0           om         [^bg]or
SFX C   0           och        [^bg]or
SFX C   0           ami        [^bg]or
SFX C   0           a          [^eo][cr]
SFX C   0           ov         [^eo][cr]
SFX C   0           ovi        [^eo][cr]
SFX C   0           om         [^eo][cr]
SFX C   0           och        [^eo][cr]
SFX C   0           mi         [^eon][cr]
SFX C   0           ami        nc
SFX C   0           a          [^céior]
SFX C   0           ov         [^céior]
SFX C   0           ovi        [^céior]
SFX C   0           om         [^céior]
SFX C   0           och        [^céior]
SFX C   0           mi         [^céiorť]
SFX C   i           ov         ovci
SFX C   i           om         ovci
SFX C   i           och        ovci
SFX C   i           ami        ovci

SFX H Y 8
SFX H   a           u          a
SFX H   a           ovi        a
SFX H   a           om         a
SFX H   a           ovia       [^t]a
SFX H   a           i          ta
SFX H   a           ov         a
SFX H   a           och        a
SFX H   0           mi         a
